Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2934
Obligation; lawful investment, when; accepted as security.

An obligation that is issued under the Infrastructure Development Investment Program Act shall be a lawful investment for any bank, trust company, insurance company, pension fund, or other fiduciary and may be accepted as security for the deposit of public money.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 34.
July 18, 2026